Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1248
Income from investments; disbursement.

Interest, premium, and other income received from investments pursuant to sections 72-1244 and 72-1267 shall be credited to the fund from which the investment was made except as otherwise provided by law.

Laws 1969, c. 584, § 12, p. 2354;

Laws 2003, LB 149, § 2.